Utah statutes.
10-19-302.   Municipal authority -- Commission authority.

(1)  The municipal legislative body may adopt procedures necessary to implement this chapter.

(2)  Nothing in this chapter authorizes the commission to exercise any power over a municipal electric utility's electrical generation, demand-side management program, or other operation.



Enacted by Chapter 374, 2008 General Session

